Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1092
Cities changing classification; school funds; to whom payable; how used.

All money arising from any source whatever which is payable to the school fund of any city of the primary class or city of the first class which may become a city of the metropolitan class, or any money which is required to be set apart by the treasurer of any such city for the support and maintenance of any school in such city, shall be payable to the treasurer of the school district and shall be used only for the purposes specified in sections 79-409, 79-476, 79-522, 79-535 to 79-537, 79-552, 79-561, 79-562, 79-567, 79-573, 79-574, 79-583, 79-584, 79-592, 79-593, 79-1086, 79-1087, 79-1092, and 79-10,126.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 28, p. 328;

R.S.1913, § 7034;

C.S.1922, § 6665;

C.S.1929, § 79-2728;

R.S.1943, § 79-2732;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 268, p. 781;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1007.04;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 738;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 41.